Massachusetts, session 194th, H3795.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 13 of chapter 6C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (c) the following subsections:-
(d) The department shall regularly review fees and fines assessed under the Pay By Plate
and E-ZPass MA Systems, as defined in 700 CMR 11.02. At least once a month the department
shall identify persons owing tolls, fines, fees or other debts of than $100. The department shall
attempt to make contact with these account holders using all possible means to let them know
their account status and to explain actions they can take to address their account balances. These
efforts shall include, but are not limited to, comparing address information on file with the
national change of address registry, communicating with the account holder by email, and calling
the account holder by cell and home phone.
of 4

(e)(1) The department shall establish a monthly payment plan option for persons owing
tolls, fines, fees or other debts of $250 or more under the Pay By Plate or E-ZPass MA systems,
as defined in 700 CMR 11.02. The minimum monthly payment due shall be $25. Upon receipt of
the first payment due under a monthly payment plan, the department shall not charge any
additional fines or fees on existing debts for late payment or failure to pay. The department may
accept automatic monthly payments by credit or debit card on file with the department or
payments made by check or money order received by mail or in person.
(2) If a person participating in a monthly payment plan is complying with all the
requirements of this subsection and any regulations promulgated by the department pursuant to
this subsection, the department shall not instruct the registry of motor vehicles to refuse to renew
the person’s license to operate a vehicle or vehicle registration due to the existence of unpaid
tolls, fines, fees or other debts owed by the person under the Pay By Plate or E-ZPass MA
systems; provided, that the department shall notify the registry of motor vehicles for the
registry’s records.
SECTION 2. Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
20G and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 20G. (a) If a person fails to appear in accordance with a notice to appear issued
pursuant to a Massachusetts Department of Transportation regulation or fails to pay in a timely
manner a violation issued pursuant to such regulations after having received notice thereof, the
authority shall notify the registrar who shall place the matter on record and shall not renew the
license to operate a motor vehicle or the registrations of any vehicles owned by such person until
the matter has been disposed of in accordance with applicable law or regulation. If the person is
of 4

found to be a resident of another state or jurisdiction, the registrar shall revoke the violator's right
to operate in the commonwealth until the matters have been disposed of in accordance with
applicable law or regulation. The liability of lessors of motor vehicles for violations on facilities
owned by the authority shall be governed by authority regulations in a manner consistent with
the provisions of section 20E. The registrar shall prescribe the manner, form and content of any
notice received from the authority to take such action.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a), the registrar may issue a conditional reinstatement
of a license to operate a motor vehicle or the vehicle registration for a person who: (i) owes tolls,
fines, fees or other debts to the Massachusetts Department of Transportation under the Pay By
Plate or E-ZPass MA systems, as defined in 700 CMR 11.02; (ii) is participating in the monthly
payment plan option, established in subsection (e) of section 13 of chapter 6C and has completed
at least 1 payment under such a monthly payment plan; (iii) is in compliance with said subsection
(e) and any relevant regulations; and (iv) is otherwise qualified to hold said license or
registration.
(2) The registrar shall revoke a license or registration that was conditionally reinstated
pursuant to paragraph (1) if: (i) the person is more than 30 days in arrears on a payment required
under a monthly payment plan entered into pursuant to subsection (e) of section 13 of chapter
6C; or (ii) for any other violation of a general or special law or regulation.
(3) Upon successful completion of the monthly payment plan established in subsection
(e) of section 13 of chapter 6C, the registrar shall fully renew the person’s license and vehicle
registration; provided, that the person is otherwise qualified to hold said license or vehicle
registration.
of 4

SECTION 3. The Massachusetts Department of Transportation and the registrar of motor
vehicles shall promulgate or amend any regulations necessary to implement this act within 5
years of its passage.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect 120 days after passage.
of 4